6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX b3 Y 191
SFX b3 er er/m't's' er po:infi
SFX b3 er ant/m't's' [^c]er po:ppre
SFX b3 cer çant/m't's' cer po:ppre
SFX b3 ecer èce/m's' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 emer ème/m's' emer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 ener ène/m's' ener po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 eper èpe/m's' eper po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 erer ère/m's' erer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 eser èse/m's' eser po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 ever ève/m's' ever po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 evrer èvre/m's' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 eter ète/m's' eter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 eler èle/m's' eler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX b3 er è/m' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX b3 ecer èces/t' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 emer èmes/t' emer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 ener ènes/t' ener po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 eper èpes/t' eper po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 erer ères/t' erer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 eser èses/t' eser po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 ever èves/t' ever po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 evrer èvres/t' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 eter ètes/t' eter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 eler èles/t' eler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX b3 er ons [^c]er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX b3 cer çons cer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX b3 er ez er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX b3 ecer ècent/s' ecer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 emer èment/s' emer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 ener ènent/s' ener po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 eper èpent/s' eper po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 erer èrent/s' erer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 eser èsent/s' eser po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 ever èvent/s' ever po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 evrer èvrent/s' evrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 eter ètent/s' eter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 eler èlent/s' eler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX b3 er ais/m't' [^c]er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 cer çais/m't' cer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 er ait/s' [^c]er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX b3 cer çait/s' cer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX b3 er ions er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX b3 er iez er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX b3 er aient/s' [^c]er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX b3 cer çaient/s' cer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX b3 er ai/m' [^c]er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX b3 cer çai/m' cer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX b3 er as/t' [^c]er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX b3 cer ças/t' cer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX b3 er a/s' [^c]er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX b3 cer ça/s' cer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX b3 er âmes [^c]er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX b3 cer çâmes cer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX b3 er âtes [^c]er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX b3 cer çâtes cer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX b3 er èrent/s' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX b3 ecer ècerai/m' ecer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 emer èmerai/m' emer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 ener ènerai/m' ener po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 eper èperai/m' eper po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 erer èrerai/m' erer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 eser èserai/m' eser po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 ever èverai/m' ever po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 evrer èvrerai/m' evrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 eter èterai/m' eter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 eler èlerai/m' eler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX b3 ecer èceras/t' ecer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 emer èmeras/t' emer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 ener èneras/t' ener po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 eper èperas/t' eper po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 erer èreras/t' erer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 eser èseras/t' eser po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 ever èveras/t' ever po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 evrer èvreras/t' evrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 eter èteras/t' eter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 eler èleras/t' eler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX b3 ecer ècera/s' ecer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 emer èmera/s' emer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 ener ènera/s' ener po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 eper èpera/s' eper po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 erer èrera/s' erer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 eser èsera/s' eser po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 ever èvera/s' ever po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 evrer èvrera/s' evrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 eter ètera/s' eter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 eler èlera/s' eler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX b3 ecer ècerons ecer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 emer èmerons emer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 ener ènerons ener po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 eper èperons eper po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 erer èrerons erer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 eser èserons eser po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 ever èverons ever po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 evrer èvrerons evrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 eter èterons eter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 eler èlerons eler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX b3 ecer ècerez ecer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 emer èmerez emer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 ener ènerez ener po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 eper èperez eper po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 erer èrerez erer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 eser èserez eser po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 ever èverez ever po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 evrer èvrerez evrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 eter èterez eter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 eler èlerez eler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX b3 ecer èceront/s' ecer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 emer èmeront/s' emer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 ener èneront/s' ener po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 eper èperont/s' eper po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 erer èreront/s' erer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 eser èseront/s' eser po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 ever èveront/s' ever po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 evrer èvreront/s' evrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 eter èteront/s' eter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 eler èleront/s' eler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX b3 ecer ècerais/m't' ecer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 emer èmerais/m't' emer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 ener ènerais/m't' ener po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 eper èperais/m't' eper po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 erer èrerais/m't' erer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 eser èserais/m't' eser po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 ever èverais/m't' ever po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 evrer èvrerais/m't' evrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 eter èterais/m't' eter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 eler èlerais/m't' eler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX b3 ecer ècerait/s' ecer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 emer èmerait/s' emer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 ener ènerait/s' ener po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 eper èperait/s' eper po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 erer èrerait/s' erer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 eser èserait/s' eser po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 ever èverait/s' ever po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 evrer èvrerait/s' evrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 eter èterait/s' eter po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 eler èlerait/s' eler po:cond po:3sg
SFX b3 ecer ècerions ecer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 emer èmerions emer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 ener ènerions ener po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 eper èperions eper po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 erer èrerions erer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 eser èserions eser po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 ever èverions ever po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 evrer èvrerions evrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 eter èterions eter po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 eler èlerions eler po:cond po:1pl
SFX b3 ecer èceriez ecer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 emer èmeriez emer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 ener èneriez ener po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 eper èperiez eper po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 erer èreriez erer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 eser èseriez eser po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 ever èveriez ever po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 evrer èvreriez evrer po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 eter èteriez eter po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 eler èleriez eler po:cond po:2pl
SFX b3 ecer èceraient/s' ecer po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 emer èmeraient/s' emer po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 ener èneraient/s' ener po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 eper èperaient/s' eper po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 erer èreraient/s' erer po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 eser èseraient/s' eser po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 ever èveraient/s' ever po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 evrer èvreraient/s' evrer po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 eter èteraient/s' eter po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 eler èleraient/s' eler po:cond po:3pl
SFX b3 er asse/m' [^c]er po:simp po:1sg
SFX b3 cer çasse/m' cer po:simp po:1sg
SFX b3 er asses/t' [^c]er po:simp po:2sg
SFX b3 cer çasses/t' cer po:simp po:2sg
SFX b3 er ât/s' [^c]er po:simp po:3sg
SFX b3 cer çât/s' cer po:simp po:3sg
SFX b3 er assions [^c]er po:simp po:1pl
SFX b3 cer çassions cer po:simp po:1pl
SFX b3 er assiez [^c]er po:simp po:2pl
SFX b3 cer çassiez cer po:simp po:2pl
SFX b3 er assent/s' [^c]er po:simp po:3pl
SFX b3 cer çassent/s' cer po:simp po:3pl
SFX b3 ecer èce/t' ecer po:impe po:2sg
SFX b3 emer ème/t' emer po:impe po:2sg
SFX b3 ener ène/t' ener po:impe po:2sg
SFX b3 eper èpe/t' eper po:impe po:2sg
SFX b3 erer ère/t' erer po:impe po:2sg
SFX b3 eser èse/t' eser po:impe po:2sg
